Hawaii statutes.
[§346-245] Hearings. The protective
proceedings shall be heard without a jury. The hearing may be adjourned from
time to time. The general public shall be excluded, and only such persons as
are found by the court to have a direct interest in the case shall be admitted.
[L 1989, c 381, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 144, §1 and c 234, §9]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next